Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1394.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "qualified taxpayer" in section 1702-H of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1702-H. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Qualified taxpayer." Any natural person, corporation, business trust, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or any other form of legal business entity that:(1) Is subject to a tax imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX, XI or XV, excluding any tax withheld by an employer under Article III.(2) Owns a qualified historic structure. The term includes an entity that is exempt from Federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) and owns a qualified historic structure.* * *Section 2. Section 1703-H(b)(5) of the act, amended July 11, 2024 (P.L.674, No.56), is amended to read:Section 1703-H. Tax credit certificates.* * *(b) Review, recommendation and approval.--* * *(5) In granting tax credit certificates under this article, the Department of Community and Economic Development:(i) Shall not grant more than $20,000,000 in tax credit certificates in any fiscal year exclusive of any tax credit certificates not awarded or returned from previous fiscal years.(ii) Shall not grant more than [$500,000] $1,500,000 in tax credit certificates to a single qualified taxpayer in any fiscal year.(iii) Shall assure that credits are awarded in an 20260SB1394PN1842 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 equitable manner to each region in this Commonwealth. However, credits allocated to a region that are unclaimed shall be promptly reallocated to eligible projects in other regions.Section 3. The amendment of section 1703-H(b)(5) of the act shall apply to fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.Section 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment of the definition of "qualified taxpayer" in section 1702-H of the act shall take effect in 60 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1394PN1842 - 3 - 123456789101112